Hawaii statutes.
§668-4 Pleadings; substitution of heirs in
case of death. [(a)] Each party shall allege the source or derivation and
devolution of the party's title, right, interest, or claim. The answers of the
defendants shall state, among other things, the precise nature and extent of
their respective interests or claims.

[(b)] If any suggestion of death of any party
is made to the court, the court shall upon ascertainment of the identity of the
heirs or devisees of the decedent, order them joined as parties as provided by
the rules of court. [L 1923, c 178, §4; RL 1925, §2764; RL 1935, §4743; RL
1945, §12453; RL 1955, §337-4; HRS §668-4; am L 1972, c 90, §11(d); gen ch
1985]

Cross References

Abatement and revival, see chapter 634, pt V.

Rules of Court

Substitution of parties, see HRCP rule 25.

Case Notes

After issue framed by amended petition and answer, petition
should not be dismissed without hearing on merits. 41 H. 504 (1956) (prior to
adoption of the Hawaii Rules of Civil Procedure).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next